Utah statutes.
19-1-103.   Definitions.
As used in this title:
(1)  "Department" means the Department of Environmental Quality.
(2)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the department
appointed pursuant to Section 19-1-104.
(3)  "Local health department" means a local health department as defined in
Title 26A, Chapter 1, Part 1.
(4)  "Person" means an individual, trust, firm, estate, company, corporation,
partnership, association, state, state or federal agency or entity,
municipality, commission, or political subdivision of a state.
